test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-uvdded_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - uʹvdded: # Verb 'to give' - full paradigm
     uʹvdded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ooudam
     uʹvdded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ooudak
     uʹvdded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: oudd
     uʹvdded+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: uʹvddep
     uʹvdded+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: uʹvddveʹted
     uʹvdded+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ouʹdde
     uʹvdded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: uuʹdet
     uʹvdded+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: uʹvddem
     uʹvdded+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: uʹvddiǩ
     uʹvdded+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: uuʹdi
     uʹvdded+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [uuʹdim, uuʹdin]
     uʹvdded+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: uuʹdid
     uʹvdded+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: uʹvdde
     uʹvdded+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: uʹvddeš 
     uʹvdded+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: ouddam
     uʹvdded+V+Pot+Sg1: uuʹdžem
     uʹvdded+V+Pot+Sg2: uuʹdžiǩ
     uʹvdded+V+Pot+Sg3: uuʹdež
     uʹvdded+V+Pot+Pl1: [uuʹdžep, uuʹdžim]
     uʹvdded+V+Pot+Pl2: uuʹdžid
     uʹvdded+V+Pot+Pl3: uuʹdže
     uʹvdded+V+Pot+Sg4: uuʹdžet
     uʹvdded+V+Pot+ConNeg: uuʹdže
     uʹvdded+V+Cond+Sg1: ooudčem
     uʹvdded+V+Cond+Sg2: ooudčiǩ
     uʹvdded+V+Cond+Sg3: ooudči
     uʹvdded+V+Cond+Pl1: [ooudčim, ooudčep]
     uʹvdded+V+Cond+Pl2: ooudčid
     uʹvdded+V+Cond+Pl3: ooudče
     uʹvdded+V+Cond+Sg4: ooudčeš
     uʹvdded+V+Cond+ConNeg: ooudče
     uʹvdded+V+Imprt+Sg2: uuʹd
     uʹvdded+V+Imprt+Sg3: ooudas
     uʹvdded+V+Imprt+Pl1: uʹvddep
     uʹvdded+V+Imprt+Pl2: uʹvdded
     uʹvdded+V+Imprt+Pl3: ouddaz
     uʹvdded+V+Imprt+ConNeg: uuʹd
     uʹvdded+V+Imprt+ConNegII: uvddu
     uʹvdded+V+Actio: uʹvddem
     uʹvdded+V+Actio+Ess: uʹvddmen
     uʹvdded+V+Act+PrsPrc: uʹvddi
     uʹvdded+V+Act+PrfPrc: ouddam
     uʹvdded+V+Pass+PrfPrc: uvddum
     uʹvdded+V+VAbess: [uuʹdkâni, uuʹdkani, uuʹdǩeânai]
     uʹvdded+V+Ger+Ess: uuʹdeen
     uʹvdded+V+Ger+Instr: uuʹdeeʹl
